California, session 20252026, AB778.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 20104.60 is added to the Public Contract Code, immediately following Section 20104.50, to read:20104.60. (a) Within 10 days of making a construction contract payment, a local agency that maintains an internet website shall post on its internet website the following:(1) The project for which the payment was made.(2) The name of the construction contractor or company paid.(3) The date the payment was made or the date the local agency transmitted instructions to make the payment.(4) The payment application number or other identifying information.(5) The amount of the payment.(b) This section shall not apply to a construction contract valued below twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).(c) A local agency that fails to comply with this section shall not withhold any retention proceeds from any remaining payment by a public entity, as described in subdivision (b) of Section 7201.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.